Tennessee statutes. Title 22 Juries And Jurors
Part 1

General Provisions

22-2-101. Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to all grand and petit juries in all circuit and criminal courts of this state. This chapter also applies to any law court in any of the counties.

Except as provided in § 22-4-101, every private act enacted in this state touching in any way upon the subject of juries, jurors or jury commissioners is repealed in its entirety.

[Deleted by 2011 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2011 amendment.]

The jury selection methods in the chancery courts of this state shall not be affected in any way by this chapter, except as provided in § 22-2-312.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1; 2011, ch. 209, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted former (b)(1) and (2) which read: “(1) This chapter shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:not less than nor more than 19,500 19,77528,350 28,450“(2) Jurors and jury panels for the courts in the counties referenced in subdivision (b)(1) shall continue to be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed immediately prior to January 1, 2009, which has been compiled in chapter 5 of this title; provided, however, that each member of the board of jury commissioners shall be paid the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day or fraction of each day spent in the discharge of the duties of the board, which shall be paid by the county from its general fund.”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 2. July 1, 2011.

Law Reviews.

What Jurors Want to Know: Motivating Juror Cognition to Increase Legal Knowledge & Improve Decisionmaking, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 752 (2014).

22-2-102. Unlawful acts — Penalties.

It is contempt of court punishable by the court wherein such violation may be under investigation, upon its own motion or upon the petition or motion of the attorney general and reporter, for any person to alter any automated jury database or jury list, to open any jury box except as provided in this chapter, to destroy, deface, or remove without authority such automated jury database, jury list, jury box or the tickets or cards in the jury box, or jury book or any portion of the jury book, to assist in or connive any such acts, or for any custodian of an automated juror database, jury box or jury list to knowingly permit any such acts to be done.

It is a Class A misdemeanor punishable by fine only for any person to request or to have another request that the person's name be placed in the jury database, upon the jury list or in the jury box for the purpose of violating this title.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The version of this chapter 2 that is applicable in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, was transferred to chapter 5 of this title by the code commission in 2008.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 22-2-101 — 22-2-315 (Acts 1959, ch. 8, §§ 1-16, 18, 19, 21; 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1961, ch. 206, § 1; 1967, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 498, § 1; 1972, ch. 826, § 1; 1974, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 254, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 714, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 903, §§ 1-8, 10, 11; 1981, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 22-223 — 22-236, 22-238 — 22-242, 22-244; Acts 1981, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 108, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 649, § 1; 1984, ch. 650, § 1; 1984, ch. 716, § 1; 1985, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 736, § 1; 1989, ch. 449, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 309, § 1; 1994, ch. 642, § 1; 2000, ch. 733, § 1; 2005, ch. 254, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 3), concerning selection and attendance of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, except in certain counties. See this version of chapter 2 for provisions effective January 1, 2009, except in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. See chapter 5 of this title for provisions effective in counties having a population of not less than 19,500, nor more than 19,775 and in counties having a population of not less than 28,350, nor more than 28,450, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 2011, ch. 209, § 1 deleted § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2), effective July 1, 2011. Since § 22-2-101(b)(1) and (2) have been deleted, this chapter is no longer only effective in certain counties, and jurors and jury panels for the counties formerly referenced in § 22-2-101(b)(1) shall no longer be selected in accordance with this chapter as it existed prior to January 1, 2009, which was formerly compiled in title 22, ch. 5, which has been deleted.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.